Georgia, session 2025_26, HB862.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other local Acts to the contrary, the sheriff of Fulton County shall be
paid an annual salary in an amount not to exceed $260,000.00, to be paid in equal
installments from the funds of Fulton County.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 862
- 1 -